District of Columbia statutes.
34-2501

Conditions under which private conduits may be laid.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to grant permission to lay conduits for the transmission of electric power and pipes for the transmission of steam in alleys in the District of Columbia, under the following conditions, namely:

(1)

The conduits or pipes shall be laid entirely within a square or block, and shall not cross or enter any avenue, street, or highway.

(2)

The conduits and pipes shall be located as directed by said Mayor and be laid under his inspection; and the cost of such inspection, together with the cost of replacing all improved pavements disturbed in connection with said work, shall be paid in advance by the party desiring to lay said conduits or steam pipes.

(3)

The conduits or pipes shall be used only to connect the premises owned and operated by the permittee, and no power or steam shall be supplied therefrom for any other purpose than the use of the permittee.

(4)

The permittee shall not rent the conduit or pipe or any portion thereof.

History

May 26, 1900, 31 Stat. 217, ch. 587, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2502 and § 34-2503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1301.
1973 Ed., § 43-1301.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.